test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-piehain_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - piehâin: # á-stems
    piehâin+N+Sg+Nom: piehâin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Gen: piehâin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Acc: piehâin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Ill: pie´hânjân
    piehâin+N+Sg+Loc: pie´hânjist
    piehâin+N+Sg+Com: pie´hânjáin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Abe: piehâinttáá
    piehâin+N+Ess: pie´hânjin
    piehâin+N+Par: pie´hânjid
    piehâin+N+Pl+Nom: pie´hânjeh
    piehâin+N+Pl+Gen: pie´hânjij
    piehâin+N+Pl+Acc: pie´hânjijd
    piehâin+N+Pl+Ill: pie´hânjáid
    piehâin+N+Pl+Loc: pie´hânjijn
    piehâin+N+Pl+Com: pie´hânjijguin
    piehâin+N+Pl+Abe: pie´hânjijttáá
    
    
